Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.110

Asian Pacific American heritage month.

The legislature declares that:

(1) May of each year will be known as Asian Pacific American heritage month;

(2) The fourth week of May is designated as a time for people of this state to celebrate the contributions to the state by Asian Pacific Americans in the arts, sciences, commerce, and education; and

(3) Educational institutions, public entities, and private organizations are encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Asian Pacific Americans.

[ 2000 c 236 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 236: See note following RCW 43.117.010.